Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-150
National Guard; officers; bond or insurance; amount; conditions.

Commanders of organizations and units and all other officers who are responsible for public military property shall execute and deliver to the Adjutant General a bond, in such sum as the Governor may direct, not exceeding five thousand dollars, payable to the State of Nebraska, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the Governor, conditioned for the proper care and use of such public property, and the return of same, in good order, ordinary wear and unavoidable loss and damage excepted; and in case of such loss or damage, the bond shall require the officer to immediately furnish the Adjutant General with properly attested affidavits, setting forth all the facts attending such loss or damage. Officers who are employees, as defined by section 81-1302, of the Military Department shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 33, p. 376;

R.S.1913, § 3933;

C.S.1922, § 3333;

C.S.1929, § 55-160;

R.S.1943, § 55-127;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 48, p. 1597;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 18;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 30.